Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.060

Motion for judicial relief.

(1) A motion for judicial relief under this chapter must be made to the court in which a proceeding is pending involving a family law dispute subject to arbitration.

(2) On motion of a party, the court may compel arbitration if the parties have entered into an arbitration agreement that complies with RCW 26.14.040 unless the court determines under RCW 26.14.110 that the arbitration should not proceed.

(3) On motion of a party, the court shall terminate arbitration if it determines that:

(a) The agreement to arbitrate is unenforceable;

(b) The family law dispute is not subject to arbitration; or

(c) Under RCW 26.14.110, the arbitration should not proceed.

(4) Unless prohibited by an arbitration agreement, on motion of a party, the court may order consolidation of separate arbitrations involving the same parties and a common issue of law or fact if necessary for the fair and expeditious resolution of the family law dispute.

[ 2023 c 61 s 7.]